Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1120.01
Communications system; declaration of legislative purpose.

The Legislature hereby declares that an efficient and reliable communications system is vital to the state during the conduct of regular business of the state and in times of emergency and that substantial economies can be effected by joint use of a consolidated communications system by departments, agencies, and subdivisions of state government. It is, therefor, declared to be the purpose of sections 23-1715, 81-1108.02, 81-1120.01 to 81-1120.03, 81-1120.15 to 81-1120.28, and 81-1423 and the policy of the state to provide for the continual development of an efficient and reliable communications system for joint use by departments, agencies, and subdivisions of state government, to effect maximum practical consolidation and joint use of existing communications facilities and services owned or used by the state, and generally to coordinate all communications functions and activities of state government.

Laws 1967, c. 572, § 1, p. 1879;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 1125, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 21.